Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB801.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 82UNIFORM CONSUMER DEBT DEFAULT JUDGMENTS ACTSec.8201. Short title of chapter.8202. Definitions.8203. Scope of chapter.8204. Complaint requirements.8205. Consumer notice.8206. Waiver void.8207. Relation to other law.8208. Uniformity of application and construction.123456789101112131415161718 8209. Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.§ 8201. Short title of chapter.This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Uniform Consumer Debt Default Judgments Act.§ 8202. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Charge off." A creditor's removal of a consumer debt as an asset from the creditor's financial records."Consumer." An individual named as a defendant in an action for collection of a consumer debt to which this chapter applies."Consumer debt." An obligation or alleged obligation of an individual to pay money that arises out of a transaction in which the money, property, insurance or service that is the subject of the transaction is primarily for a personal, family or household purpose."Creditor." A person to which a consumer debt is owed at the time of charge off or, if the debt was not charged off, at the time of default."Default." Except in the term "default judgment," a failure to satisfy a consumer debt that gives rise to an action to which this chapter applies."Electronic." Relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic or similar capabilities."Finance charge." The term has the same meaning as in section 106 of the Truth in Lending Act (Public Law 90-321, 15 U.S.C. § 1605).20250HB0801PN0829 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Outstanding balance." The amount owed on a consumer debt:(1) at the time of charge off or, if the debt was not charged off, at the time of default; or(2) after disposition of property that secured the debt."Person." An individual, estate, business or nonprofit entity, government or governmental subdivision, agency or instrumentality or other legal entity."Record." Information:(1) inscribed on a tangible medium; or(2) stored in an electronic or other medium and retrievable in perceivable form."Secured consumer debt." A consumer debt secured by real or personal property."Sign." With present intent to authenticate or adopt a record:(1) execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or(2) attach to or logically associate with the record an electronic symbol, sound or process."Unsecured consumer debt." A consumer debt not secured by real or personal property.§ 8203. Scope of chapter.(a) Actions covered.--Except as provided in subsection (b), this chapter applies to the award of a default judgment in an action for collection of:(1) an unsecured consumer debt;(2) a secured consumer debt if the action is brought solely to obtain a money judgment; or(3) a deficiency that remains after disposition of property that secured a consumer debt.(b) Nonapplicability.--This chapter does not apply to:20250HB0801PN0829 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) an action to take possession of or dispose of real or personal property, even if the action includes a request for a money judgment; or(2) an action to collect a debt owed to a government, governmental subdivision or agency in which the government, governmental subdivision or agency is the plaintiff.§ 8204. Complaint requirements.(a) Compliance and notice.--A default judgment in an action to which this chapter applies may be entered only if the complaint or amended complaint complies with this section and includes the notice required under section 8205 (relating to consumer notice).(b) Contents of complaint.--The complaint or amended complaint must state:(1) each name and address of the consumer in the records of the creditor at the time of charge off or, if the consumer debt was not charged off, at the time of default;(2) the name of the creditor, including any merchant brand, affinity brand or facility name associated with the debt;(3) at least the last four digits of the account number or other account identifier used in communicating with the consumer before charge off or, if the debt was not charged off, before default;(4) the date and amount of the last payment;(5) the date of charge off or, if the debt was not charged off, the date of default;(6) the amount of the outstanding balance;(7) the amount of the judgment the plaintiff seeks, itemizing the outstanding balance and the following amounts 20250HB0801PN0829 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 not included in the outstanding balance:(i) total finance charges;(ii) total fees or costs;(iii) total attorneys fees; and(iv) total credits and payments;(8) a statement whether the amount of the judgment may increase due to accrued interest, fees or other charges;(9) the authority of the plaintiff to commence the action;(10) facts sufficient to demonstrate that the action is being commenced in a proper venue;(11) facts sufficient to demonstrate that the action is being commenced within the statute of limitation period applicable to the debt;(12) unless the plaintiff is the creditor:(i) the name of each person that acquired ownership of the debt after charge off or, if the debt was not charged off, after default; and(ii) the date of each acquisition; and(13) information sufficient to demonstrate that the plaintiff possesses a valid bond if required under law of this Commonwealth.(c) Records.--Subject to authentication required by other law of this Commonwealth and rules of procedure, the plaintiff must attach to the complaint or amended complaint:(1) at least one of the following that is sufficient to demonstrate the existence of the consumer debt:(i) an agreement signed by the consumer;(ii) a record of a purchase, payment or use of an account; or20250HB0801PN0829 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) a record otherwise demonstrating the debt was incurred; and(2) if the plaintiff is not the creditor, documentation sufficient to demonstrate the authority of the plaintiff to collect the debt.§ 8205. Consumer notice.(a) Warning required.--A default judgment may be entered in an action to which this chapter applies only if the complaint or amended complaint served on the consumer is accompanied by a separate notice warning that a default judgment may be awarded against the consumer.(b) Contents of notice.--The notice must be in a record substantially similar to the form in subsection (c) that states:(1) if the consumer does not file an answer to the complaint or amended complaint within the time and in the manner indicated in the notice to defend or appear for the hearing referred to in the notice to defend, a default judgment may be entered against the consumer;(2) if a judgment is entered against the consumer, the amount of the judgment, plus interest on the judgment as provided by other law of this Commonwealth, remains in effect as provided in sections 5526 (relating to five year limitation) and 5529 (relating to twenty year limitation), even if the judgment no longer remains on the consumer's credit report;(3) after entry of a judgment, the plaintiff may initiate an action to sell real estate owned by the consumer or personal property owned by the consumer and attach the consumer's bank accounts;(4) entry of a judgment may impair access to employment, 20250HB0801PN0829 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 insurance, credit or housing;(5) an attorney may provide assistance in understanding the complaint or amended complaint and advice about what action to take in response to the complaint or amended complaint; and(6) the name and contact information for a legal aid or attorney referral service that may be able to help the consumer find an attorney and, if the consumer cannot afford an attorney, may be able to provide free or reduced-cost legal services.(c) Form of notice.--The following notice meets the requirements of this section:Consumer NoticeWarningIf You Do Not Act, A Default Judgment May Be Entered Against You1. Why Am I Getting This Notice?You are getting this notice because (name of plaintiff) says you owe money.(Name or shortened name of plaintiff) has filed a lawsuit against you to collect the money.2. What Will Happen If I Do Nothing?If you do not file a response to the lawsuit or appear at a hearing on (enter date) at (time), a judgment may be entered against you.3. What Happens If A Judgment Is Entered Against Me?Your personal property may be taken and sold. Money may be taken directly from your bank 20250HB0801PN0829 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 account. A lien may be put on your house or other real estate and the house or real estate may be sold.If the judgment is not paid in full, the amount due may grow because of interest charges.You will owe the amount of the judgment for at least five or twenty years, even if it no longer appears on your credit report.The judgment may make it harder for you to get a job or insurance and more expensive for you to get a loan or credit card, rent an apartment or buy a house or car.4. Is Help Available? Talk with a lawyer. A lawyer can explain the situation and help you decide what to do. The following office may be able to help you find a lawyer: (insert name and contact information for legal aid or lawyer referral service that may be able to help defendant find a lawyer). If you cannot afford a lawyer, you may be able to obtain one for free or reduced cost.20250HB0801PN0829 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 8206. Waiver void.A waiver by a consumer of a requirement of this chapter is void. This section does not prevent a voluntary settlement agreement or judgment between the parties that does not result in a default judgment.§ 8207. Relation to other law.This chapter supplements rights and remedies available to a consumer under other law of this Commonwealth.§ 8208. Uniformity of application and construction.In applying and construing this uniform act, a court shall consider the promotion of uniformity of the law among jurisdictions that enact it.§ 8209. Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.This chapter modifies, limits or supersedes the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act (Public Law 106-229, 15 U.S.C. § 7001 et seq.) but does not modify, limit or supersede 15 U.S.C. § 7001(c) (relating to general rule of validity) or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in 15 U.S.C. § 7003(b) (relating to specific exceptions).Section 2. This chapter applies to an action commenced on or after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0801PN0829 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324